Utah statutes.
48-2a-108.   Conversion of certain entities to a limited partnership.
Any subject entity may convert to a limited partnership under this chapter by
complying with Section 48-2a-111 and filing with the division:
(1)  articles of conversion that satisfy the requirements of Section
48-2a-109; and
(2)  a certificate of limited partnership that satisfies the requirements of
Section 48-2a-201.
